Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3720
Act; administrative procedures.

Except as otherwise provided in the Motor Club Services Act, all hearings held by and all orders and decisions made or any failure to act by the director pursuant to the Motor Club Services Act shall be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act. Any order of the director may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 20;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 71.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.